District of Columbia statutes.
41-142

Retroactivity of chapter.

This chapter shall apply retroactively to all items of property which would have been presumed abandoned if this chapter had been in effect as of January 1, 1980.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 301(b), 27 DCR 5150

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-242.